Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-505
Unlawful discrimination; penalty.

Any person, firm, company, association or corporation violating any of the provisions of sections 59-501 and 59-503, and any officer, agent or receiver of any firm, company, association or corporation, or any member of the same, or any individual, violating any of the provisions of said sections, shall be deemed guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1939, c. 77, § 2, p. 315;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 59-524;

R.S.1943, § 59-505;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 61.